Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 6
PEST AND PLANT QUARANTINE

35-6-101 to 35-6-108. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article repealed, p. 1135, § 15, effective May 16.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 11 of chapter 6, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1985, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning the quarantine and control of pests, see §§ 35-4-110 and 35-4-110.5.